Hawaii statutes.
[§196D-10] Transfer of functions. (a)
Those functions identified in paragraphs (1) and (2) insofar as they relate to
the permit application, review, processing, issuance, and monitoring of laws,
and rules and to the enforcement of terms, conditions, and stipulations of
permits and other authorizations issued by agencies with respect to the
development, construction, installation, operation, maintenance, repair, and
replacement of the project, or any portion or portions thereof, are transferred
to the department. With respect to each of the statutory authorities cited in
paragraphs (1) and (2), the transferred functions include all enforcement
functions of the agencies or their officials under the statute cited as may be
related to the enforcement of the terms, conditions, and stipulations of
permits, including but not limited to the specific sections of the statute
cited. "Enforcement", for purposes of this transfer of functions,
includes monitoring and any other compliance or oversight activities reasonably
related to the enforcement process. These transferred functions include:

(1) Such functions of the land use commission related
to: district boundary amendments as set forth in section 205-3.1 et seq.; and
changes in zoning as set forth in section 205-5; and

(2) The permit approval and enforcement functions of
the director of transportation or other appropriate official or entity in the
department of transportation related to permits or approvals issued for the use
of or commercial activities in or affecting the ocean waters and shores of the
State under chapter 266.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed
to relieve an applicant from the laws, ordinances, and rules of any agency
whose functions are not transferred by this section to the department for the
purposes of the project.

(c) This section shall not apply to any permit
issued by the public utilities commission under chapter 269.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of
this chapter, this section shall take effect on July 1, 1989. [L 1988, c
301, pt of §1]

Note

"July 1, 1989" substituted for "a date
that is one year after the effective date of this chapter".

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next